Alaska, session 34, HB289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 07 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act to the agencies named for the 03 purposes expressed for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026, 04 unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 40,900 40,900 11 Commission 12 Alaska Oil and Gas 40,900 13 Conservation Commission 14 Alaska Energy Authority 250,000 250,000 15 Alaska Energy Authority 250,000 16 Rural Energy Assistance 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Population Management 20,000,000 20,000,000 21 Institution Director's 20,000,000 22 Office 23 Community Residential Centers 1,117,500 1,117,500 24 Community Residential 1,117,500 25 Centers 26 Health and Rehabilitation Services 2,952,500 2,952,500 27 Physical Health Care 2,952,500 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 Alaska State Council on the Arts 12,900 12,900 01 Alaska State Council on the 12,900 02 Arts 03 Student Financial Aid Programs 3,321,600 3,321,600 04 Alaska Performance 2,214,400 05 Scholarship Awards 06 Alaska Education Grants 1,107,200 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Commercial Fisheries 651,400 456,400 195,000 11 Southeast Region Fisheries 128,500 12 Management 13 Central Region Fisheries 254,600 14 Management 15 AYK Region Fisheries 109,000 16 Management 17 Westward Region Fisheries 142,700 18 Management 19 Statewide Fisheries 16,600 20 Management 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 Behavioral Health 500,000 500,000 25 Behavioral Health 500,000 26 Administration 27 Public Assistance 31,441,900 12,826,900 18,615,000 28 Public Assistance Field 26,941,900 29 Services 30 Women, Infants and Children 4,500,000 31 Public Health 4,350,000 4,350,000 01 Public Health 4,350,000 02 Administrative Services 03 Senior Benefits Payment Program 1,125,000 1,125,000 04 Senior Benefits Payment 1,125,000 05 Program 06 Departmental Support Services 177,600 177,600 07 Rate Review 177,600 08 Medicaid Services 395,516,800 34,436,700 361,080,100 09 Medicaid Services 395,516,800 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 Fire Suppression, Land & Water 1,841,600 304,100 1,537,500 14 Resources 15 Fire Suppression 1,841,600 16 Preparedness 17 Parks & Outdoor Recreation 1,325,500 530,200 795,300 18 Office of History and 1,325,500 19 Archaeology 20 * * * * * * * * * * 21 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 Village Public Safety Operations 1,250,000 1,250,000 24 Village Public Safety 1,250,000 25 Operations 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Taxation and Treasury 316,800 316,800 30 Alaska Retirement 150,000 31 Management Board 01 Permanent Fund Dividend 166,800 02 Division 03 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 15,300,000 15,300,000 04 AHFC Operations 15,300,000 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 Administration and Support 84,000 84,000 09 Measurement Standards & 84,000 10 Commercial Vehicle 11 Compliance 12 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 543,300 500,000 43,300 13 Central Region Highways and 500,000 14 Aviation 15 Northern Region Highways 43,300 16 and Aviation 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 University of Alaska 38,000,000 38,000,000 21 Budget Reductions/Additions 23,000,000 22 - Systemwide 23 Troth Yeddha' Campus 15,000,000 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Therapeutic Courts 38,600 38,600 28 Therapeutic Courts 38,600 29 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 40,900 06 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund 250,000 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 290,900 08 Department of Corrections 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 24,070,000 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 24,070,000 11 Department of Education and Early Development 12 1002 Federal Receipts 12,900 13 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 3,321,600 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,334,500 15 Department of Fish and Game 16 1002 Federal Receipts 79,400 17 1003 General Fund Match 15,900 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 433,300 19 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 4,900 20 1007 Interagency Receipts 2,300 21 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 43,400 22 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 69,900 23 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 2,300 24 *** Total Agency Funding *** 651,400 25 Department of Health 26 1002 Federal Receipts 384,045,100 27 1003 General Fund Match 47,263,600 28 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,125,000 29 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 177,600 30 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 31 *** Total Agency Funding *** 433,111,300 01 Department of Natural Resources 02 1002 Federal Receipts 817,900 03 1003 General Fund Match 530,200 04 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 304,100 05 1007 Interagency Receipts 1,510,000 06 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 4,900 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,167,100 08 Department of Public Safety 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,250,000 10 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,250,000 11 Department of Revenue 12 1002 Federal Receipts 15,300,000 13 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 68,100 14 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 52,800 15 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 27,800 16 1042 Judicial Retirement System 1,100 17 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 200 18 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 166,800 19 *** Total Agency Funding *** 15,616,800 20 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 21 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 500,000 22 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 84,000 23 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 43,300 24 *** Total Agency Funding *** 627,300 25 University of Alaska 26 1002 Federal Receipts 15,000,000 27 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 8,000,000 28 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 15,000,000 29 *** Total Agency Funding *** 38,000,000 30 Judiciary 31 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 38,600 01 *** Total Agency Funding *** 38,600 02 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 520,157,900 03 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 47,809,700 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 27,223,300 07 1012 Railbelt Energy Fund 250,000 08 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 75,283,000 09 Designated General 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 682,500 11 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 2,300 12 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 3,321,600 13 *** Total Designated General *** 4,006,400 14 Other Non-Duplicated 15 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 68,100 16 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 52,800 17 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 27,800 18 1042 Judicial Retirement System 1,100 19 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 200 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 8,608,500 21 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 43,300 22 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 8,801,800 23 Federal Receipts 24 1002 Federal Receipts 415,255,300 25 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 415,255,300 26 Other Duplicated 27 1007 Interagency Receipts 1,512,300 28 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 166,800 29 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 132,300 30 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 15,000,000 31 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 16,811,400 01 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Alaska Energy Authority Bulk Fuel 25,000,000 25,000,000 10 Upgrades (HD 1-40) 11 Alaska Energy Authority - Bulk Fuel 5,000,000 5,000,000 12 Upgrades High Energy Cost Grant (HD 1- 13 40) 14 Alaska Energy Authority - Electrical 150,870 150,870 15 Emergencies Program (HD 1-40) 16 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 1,201,081 1,201,081 17 Commission Risk Based Data Management 18 System Upgrade Phase 2 (HD 1-40) 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 Protecting Coastal Alaska Native 6,000,000 6,000,000 23 Communities (HD 1-40) 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Child Support Case Management System 3,651,843 3,221,623 430,220 28 Replacement (HD 1-40) 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 Federal Program Match 69,695,087 69,695,087 02 Federal-Aid Aviation State 9,807,384 03 Match (HD 1-40) 04 Federal-Aid Highway State 58,276,155 05 Match (HD 1-40) 06 Other Federal Program Match 1,611,548 07 (HD 1-40) 08 Statewide Federal Programs 459,000 459,000 09 Federal Transit 400,000 10 Administration Grants (HD 11 1-40) 12 Highway Safety Grants 59,000 13 Program (HD 1-40) 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 University of Alaska Museum of the 8,000,000 8,000,000 18 North Planetarium (HD 31-35) 19 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 5,000,000 06 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 25,000,000 07 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission Receipts 1,201,081 08 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 150,870 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 31,351,951 10 Department of Natural Resources 11 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 6,000,000 12 *** Total Agency Funding *** 6,000,000 13 Department of Revenue 14 1002 Federal Receipts 430,220 15 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 3,221,623 16 *** Total Agency Funding *** 3,651,843 17 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 18 1003 General Fund Match 69,695,087 19 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 459,000 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 70,154,087 21 University of Alaska 22 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 8,000,000 23 *** Total Agency Funding *** 8,000,000 24 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 119,157,881 25 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 69,695,087 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 459,000 07 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 70,154,087 08 Designated General 09 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 3,221,623 10 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission Receipts 1,201,081 11 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 150,870 12 *** Total Designated General *** 4,573,574 13 Other Non-Duplicated 14 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 39,000,000 15 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 39,000,000 16 Federal Receipts 17 1002 Federal Receipts 5,430,220 18 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 5,430,220 19 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. The sum of $3,300,000 is appropriated 02 from the general fund to the Department of Administration, legal and advocacy services, 03 office of public advocacy, to address case backlogs for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, 04 and June 30, 2027. 05 * Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. (a) Section 06 36(d), ch. 7, SLA 2024, is amended to read: 07 (d) The proceeds from the sale of the Stratton building in Sitka by the 08 Department of Education and Early Development or the Department of Natural 09 Resources are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education and 10 Early Development, Alaska state libraries, archives and museums, for maintenance 11 and operations for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, and 12 June 30, 2027. 13 (b) The amount of federal receipts received from the American Rescue Plan Act of 14 2021 (P.L. 117-2) for emergency assistance for nonpublic schools in the fiscal year ending 15 June 30, 2026, estimated to be $65,500, is appropriated to the Department of Education and 16 Early Development for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 17 * Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. (a) Section 62(g), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, is amended 18 to read: 19 (g) The sum of $2,273,300 is appropriated to the Department of Health, 20 Medicaid services, Medicaid services allocation, for creation of a cost allocation 21 assessment tool by the Department of Health, division of senior and disabilities 22 services, for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 23 2026, June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, June 30, 2029, June 30, 2030, and June 30, 24 2031, from the following sources: 25 (1) $2,046,000 from federal receipts; 26 (2) $227,300 from general fund match. 27 (b) Section 62(h), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023, is amended to read: 28 (h) The sum of $1,119,000 is appropriated to the Department of Health, senior 29 and disabilities services, senior and disabilities services administration, for creation of 30 a cost allocation assessment tool, for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, June 30, 31 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, from the following sources: 01 (1) $698,500 from federal receipts; 02 (2) $420,500 from general fund match. 03 (c) Section 15(c), ch. 10, SLA 2025, is amended to read: 04 (c) The sum of $5,954,328 is appropriated from the general fund to the 05 Department of Health, division of public assistance, for the purpose of addressing 06 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program new investment projects for the fiscal 07 years ending June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 08 2028. 09 (d) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balance on June 30, 2026, not to 10 exceed $10,000,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 24, line 32, 11 and allocated on page 25, line 7 (Department of Health, Medicaid services, Medicaid services 12 - $2,975,200,200), is reappropriated to the Department of Health, Medicaid services, for 13 behavioral health clinic services for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 14 (e) The amount of federal receipts received from sec. 71401, P.L. 119-21, 139 Stat. 15 327, for the federal rural health transformation program, estimated to be $272,174,856, is 16 appropriated to the Department of Health for that purpose for the fiscal years ending June 30, 17 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028. 18 * Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF LAW. The sum of $32,024 is appropriated from the general 19 fund to the Department of Law, civil division, deputy attorney general's office, for the 20 purpose of paying judgments and settlements against the state for the fiscal year ending 21 June 30, 2026. 22 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. The amount necessary to pay externally 23 managed investment profit sharing fees, estimated to be $13,600,000, is appropriated from the 24 retirement funds managed by the Alaska Retirement Management Board to the Department of 25 Revenue for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 26 * Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. Section 27 5, ch. 10, SLA 2025, page 68, lines 1 - 4, is amended to read: 28 Sec. 5. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from 29 the general fund or other funds as set out in sec. 6, ch. 10, SLA 2025, [OF THIS ACT] 30 to the agencies named for the purposes expressed [FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR] 31 beginning January 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 [DECEMBER 31, 2026], unless 01 otherwise indicated. 02 * Sec. 13. UNIVERSITY OF ALASKA. Section 74, ch. 11, SLA 2022, as amended by sec. 03 22, ch. 7, SLA 2024, is amended to read: 04 Sec. 74. UNIVERSITY OF ALASKA. The sum of $29,800,000 is 05 appropriated from the general fund to the University of Alaska for responding to the 06 negative economic impacts of COVID-19 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, 07 June 30, 2024, June 30, 2025, [AND] June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, for the 08 following purposes and in the following amounts: 09 PURPOSE AMOUNT 10 University of Alaska drone program $10,000,000 11 Critical minerals and rare earth elements 7,800,000 12 research and development 13 Heavy oil recovery method 5,000,000 14 research and development 15 Mariculture research and development 7,000,000 16 * Sec. 14. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) Section 41(g), ch. 10, SLA 2025, is 17 amended to read: 18 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from 19 the specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 20 2026: 21 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 22 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 23 estimated to be $2,259,773, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 24 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 25 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general 26 obligation bonds; 27 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 28 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after 29 the payment made in (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $144,127, from the general 30 fund for that purpose; 31 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 01 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, 02 estimated to be $434,570, from the amount received from the United States Treasury 03 as a result of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School 04 Construction Bond interest subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general 05 obligation bonds; 06 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 07 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after 08 the payments made in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $26,268, from the general 09 fund for that purpose; 10 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 11 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2015B, 12 estimated to be $9,793,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 13 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 14 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016A, 15 estimated to be $6,247,375, from the general fund for that purpose; 16 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 17 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016B, 18 estimated to be $6,226,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 19 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 20 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, 21 estimated to be $6,971,625, from the general fund for that purpose; 22 (9) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment for 23 arbitrage rebate on State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated 24 to be $4,025,000, from investment earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in the 25 capital project funds for the series 2020A general obligation bonds for that purpose; 26 (10) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 27 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2023A, 28 estimated to be $18,398,750, from the general fund for that purpose; 29 (11) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 30 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024A, 31 estimated to be $5,504,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 01 (12) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 02 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024B, 03 estimated to be $4,135,837 [$4,147,000], from the general fund for that purpose; 04 (13) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 05 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2025A, 06 estimated to be $2,715,892 [$3,956,229], from the general fund for that purpose; 07 (14) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding 08 State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 2013A, 2015B, 2016A, 09 2016B, 2020A, 2023A, 2024A, 2024B, and 2025A, estimated to be $7,500, from the 10 general fund for that purpose; 11 (15) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment to 12 the United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax penalties on 13 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be $50,000, from 14 the general fund for that purpose; 15 (16) if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are 16 temporarily insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with 17 these proceeds, the amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general 18 fund, contingent on repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general 19 obligation bond proceeds have been received by the state; and 20 (17) if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued 21 interest on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the amounts 22 appropriated in this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the obligations, 23 from the general fund for that purpose. 24 (b) Section 41(k), ch. 10, SLA 2025, is amended to read: 25 (k) The amount necessary for payment of obligations and fees for the Goose 26 Creek Correctional Center, estimated to be $14,894,358 [$16,170,163], is appropriated 27 from the general fund to the Department of Administration for that purpose for the 28 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 29 * Sec. 15. FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) Section 43(v), ch. 10, SLA 2025, is amended to 30 read: 31 (v) The sum of $52,982,700 [$50,482,700] is appropriated to the fire 01 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities from the following 02 sources: 03 (1) $5,000,000 [$3,000,000] from statutory designated program 04 receipts; [AND] 05 (2) $47,482,700 from the general fund; and 06 (3) $500,000 from interagency receipts. 07 (b) The sum of $40,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief 08 fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 09 (c) The sum of $35,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief 10 fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 11 (d) The sum of $98,715,900 is appropriated from the general fund to the fire 12 suppression fund (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities. 13 * Sec. 16. FUND TRANSFER. An amount equal to the amount appropriated from the 14 Alaska higher education investment fund (AS 37.14.750) in sec. 49(b), ch. 10, SLA 2025, 15 estimated to be $129,598,900, is appropriated from the general fund to the Alaska higher 16 education investment fund (AS 37.14.750). 17 * Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 18 DEVELOPMENT: CAPITAL. The amount received from the United States Department of 19 Housing and Urban Development for community development block grant disaster recovery 20 programs during the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, is appropriated to 21 the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for disaster recovery 22 programs. 23 * Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS: CAPITAL. The unexpended and 24 unobligated balance, not to exceed $3,033,189, of the appropriation made in sec. 14, ch. 11, 25 SLA 2022, page 122, lines 30 - 31 (Department of Corrections, Hiland Mountain intake 26 administration project - $3,200,000), is reappropriated to the Department of Corrections to 27 upgrade and replace outdated handheld radio systems and associated communications 28 equipment. 29 * Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS: CAPITAL. The 30 unexpended and unobligated general fund balance, not to exceed $130,000, of the 31 appropriation made in sec. 14, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 125, lines 21 - 23 (Department of 01 Military and Veterans' Affairs, Alaska Military Youth Academy (AMYA) construction, 02 contingency, and planning - $750,000), is reappropriated to the Department of Military and 03 Veterans' Affairs to provide matching funds for the state and local cybersecurity grant 04 program. 05 * Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES: 06 CAPITAL. (a) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2026, of the Alaska 07 capital income fund (AS 37.05.565) is appropriated to the Department of Transportation and 08 Public Facilities for statewide critical deferred maintenance, renovation, and repair. 09 (b) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, estimated to be a total of 10 $5,022,658, of the following appropriations are reappropriated to the Department of 11 Transportation and Public Facilities for responding to emergency weather, catastrophic 12 events, and unforeseen critical maintenance needs: 13 (1) sec. 1, ch. 82, SLA 2006, page 86, lines 15 - 17 (Department of 14 Transportation and Public Facilities, international intermodal connectivity project - 15 $5,000,000), estimated balance of $478,949; 16 (2) sec. 4, ch. 30, SLA 2007, page 104, lines 19 - 21 (Department of 17 Transportation and Public Facilities, MSCVE weigh station maintenance and repair - 18 $300,000), estimated balance of $8,426; 19 (3) sec. 10, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 79, lines 8 - 10 (Department of 20 Transportation and Public Facilities, University Avenue widening and rehabilitation - 21 $5,000,000), estimated balance of $1,367,389; 22 (4) sec. 10, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 79, lines 27 - 28, and allocated on page 23 80, lines 6 - 8 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, facilities deferred 24 maintenance, oil/water separators and fuel tank replacement - $1,431,000), estimated balance 25 of $40,254; 26 (5) sec. 10, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 79, lines 27 - 28, and allocated on page 27 80, lines 9 - 10 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, facilities deferred 28 maintenance, roof repair and replacement - $3,952,000), estimated balance of $2,905; 29 (6) sec. 1, ch. 15, SLA 2009, page 21, lines 24 - 26 (Department of 30 Transportation and Public Facilities, Americans with Disabilities Act compliance projects - 31 $238,000), estimated balance of $11,136; 01 (7) sec. 7, ch. 43, SLA 2010, page 37, line 11, and allocated on page 37, lines 02 12 - 14 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, highways and facilities, 03 Americans with Disabilities Act compliance projects - $500,000), estimated balance of $363; 04 (8) sec. 7, ch. 43, SLA 2010, page 37, line 11, and allocated on page 37, lines 05 18 - 20 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, highways and facilities, highway 06 safety corridors near-term improvements - $5,000,000), estimated balance of $854,555; 07 (9) sec. 1, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 100, lines 15 - 18 (Department of 08 Transportation and Public Facilities, infrastructure and erosion control design and 09 environmental permitting - $300,000), estimated balance of $138,442; 10 (10) sec. 1, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 101, lines 7 - 10 (Department of 11 Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide, rural airport emergency medical evacuation 12 lights battery replacement - $46,000), estimated balance of $21,695; 13 (11) sec. 13, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 155, line 13, and allocated on page 155, 14 lines 16 - 17 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, emergency projects, Hyder, 15 Salmon River levee rehabilitation - $472,000), estimated balance of $7,732; 16 (12) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 133, lines 13 - 15 (Department of 17 Transportation and Public Facilities, O'Malley trail and sidewalk northside improvements - 18 $1,000,000), estimated balance of $14,874; 19 (13) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 133, line 28, and allocated on page 134, 20 lines 3 - 4 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, roads to resources, resource 21 roads program - $2,000,000), estimated balance of $37,851; 22 (14) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 134, line 22, and allocated on page 135, 23 lines 17 - 19 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, safety, statewide, structural 24 inspection of state owned facilities - $300,000), estimated balance of $105,153; 25 (15) sec. 35(c)(1), ch. 18, SLA 2014 (Department of Transportation and 26 Public Facilities, Big Lake Road pedestrian improvements study - $250,000), estimated 27 balance of $42,601; 28 (16) sec. 35(c)(2), ch. 18, SLA 2014 (Department of Transportation and 29 Public Facilities, Central Region rural airport sanitation facilities - $500,000), estimated 30 balance of $500,000; 31 (17) sec. 16(d), ch. 38, SLA 2015 (Department of Transportation and Public 01 Facilities, replacement of the Kalsin Bay maintenance station), estimated balance of 02 $326,941; 03 (18) sec. 1, ch. 1, TSSLA 2017, page 8, lines 16 - 19 (Department of 04 Transportation and Public Facilities, municipal harbor facility grant fund (AS 29.60.800), 05 municipal harbor facility grant fund projects - $5,000,000), estimated balance of $225,793; 06 (19) sec. 21(j)(2), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and 07 Public Facilities, federal-aid highway match), estimated balance of $275,667; 08 (20) sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2018, page 10, lines 14 - 15 (Department of 09 Transportation and Public Facilities, public and community transportation state match - 10 $500,000), estimated balance of $62,157; 11 (21) sec. 8, ch. 1, SSSLA 2021, page 79, lines 27 - 28 (Department of 12 Transportation and Public Facilities, municipal harbor facility grant fund - $6,729,988), 13 estimated balance of $275,517; 14 (22) sec. 43(c), ch. 11, SLA 2022 (Department of Transportation and Public 15 Facilities, repairing the Eagle River Road bike path), estimated balance of $112,986; 16 (23) sec. 41(a)(3), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023 (Department of Transportation and 17 Public Facilities, unforeseen critical maintenance needs and responding to emergency weather 18 conditions and catastrophic events), estimated balance of $26,321; and 19 (24) sec. 41(a)(7), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023 (Department of Transportation and 20 Public Facilities, unforeseen critical maintenance needs and responding to emergency weather 21 conditions and catastrophic events), estimated balance of $84,951. 22 * Sec. 21. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) If the unrestricted state 23 revenue available for appropriation in fiscal year 2026 is insufficient to cover the general fund 24 appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2026 that are made in this Act, as passed by the 25 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the Second Regular Session and enacted into law, 26 and the general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2026 that are made in ch. 10, 27 SLA 2025, ch. 11, SLA 2025, and ch. 12, SLA 2025, the amount necessary to balance 28 revenue and general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal year 2026 that are made in 29 this Act, as passed by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature in the Second Regular 30 Session and enacted into law, and the general fund appropriations that take effect in fiscal 31 year 2026 that are made in ch. 10, SLA 2025, ch. 11, SLA 2025, and ch. 12, SLA 2025, plus 01 an additional $30,000,000, is appropriated to the general fund from the budget reserve fund 02 (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska). 03 (b) The appropriations made from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, 04 Constitution of the State of Alaska) in (a) of this section are made under art. IX, sec. 17(c), 05 Constitution of the State of Alaska. 06 * Sec. 22. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. (a) The appropriations made in secs. 4 and 17 - 07 20 of this Act are for capital projects and lapse under AS 37.25.020. 08 (b) The appropriations made in secs. 15(b) - (d) and 16 of this Act are for the 09 capitalization of funds and do not lapse. 10 * Sec. 23. RETROACTIVITY. (a) Sections 1 - 8, 9(a) - (c) and (e), 10 - 17, 20(a), 21, 22, 11 and 24 of this Act are retroactive to March 1, 2026. 12 (b) Sections 9(d), 18, 19, and 20(b) of this Act are retroactive to June 30, 2026. 13 * Sec. 24. CONTINGENCY. The appropriation made in sec. 15(c) of this Act is contingent 14 on the state's match rate as of June 30, 2026, remaining at 25 percent of the state's costs for 15 disaster relief under the Federal Emergency Management Agency's major disaster declaration 16 for the state because of Typhoon Halong (FEMA-4893-DR). 17 * Sec. 25. Sections 9(d), 18, 19, and 20(b) of this Act take effect June 30, 2026. 18 * Sec. 26. Except as provided in sec. 25 of this Act, this Act takes effect immediately under 19 AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.